District of Columbia statutes.
46-416.01

Social security numbers to be filed with application.

(a)

Each applicant for a marriage license shall record on the application each social security number assigned to the applicant. If the applicants’ social security numbers are not recorded on the face of the license, the agency shall keep on file each applicant’s social security number and each applicant shall be so advised.

(b)

The social security number shall be disclosed only:

(1)

For a purpose directly related to the establishment of paternity, or the establishment, modification, or enforcement of a support order; and

(2)

To the applicant, the other spouse, the child of the applicant or spouse, their attorneys of record, the IV-D agency, a District agency that has entered into a cooperative agreement with the IV-D agency, the IV-D agency of another state, or a private entity with which the District has contracted regarding paternity and child support services.

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 959, Pub. L. 89-682, § 1a
as added Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 107(b), 48 DCR 1270
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 107(b) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 106(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 106(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 106(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 106(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary addition of section, see § 6(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 6(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 6(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 6(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary addition of section, see § 6(b) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 106(b) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 6(b) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR).
This section is referenced in § 46-416.